Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4723
Supervision, rehabilitation, conservation, or liquidation; proceedings authorized.

Any supervision, rehabilitation, conservation, or liquidation of a prepaid limited health service organization shall be deemed to be the supervision, rehabilitation, conservation, or liquidation of an insurance company and shall be conducted pursuant to the Nebraska Insurers Supervision, Rehabilitation, and Liquidation Act. No prepaid limited health service organization shall be subject to the insurance laws, rules, and regulations governing insurance insolvency guaranty funds, nor shall any insurance insolvency guaranty fund provide protection to any individuals entitled to receive limited health services from a prepaid limited health service organization.

Laws 1989, LB 320, § 23;

Laws 1989, LB 319, § 79.

Nebraska Insurers Supervision, Rehabilitation, and Liquidation Act, see section 44-4862.